Montana, session 2025, HB395.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 13-1-101, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-1-101. Definitions. As used in this title, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the
following definitions apply:
(1) "Active elector" means an elector whose name has not been placed on the inactive list due to
failure to respond to confirmation notices pursuant to 13-2-220 or 13-19-313.
(2) "Active list" means a list of active electors maintained pursuant to 13-2-220.
(3) "Anything of value" means any goods that have a certain utility to the recipient that is real and
that is ordinarily not given away free but is purchased.
(4) "Application for voter registration" means a voter registration form prescribed by the secretary
of state that is completed and signed by an elector, is submitted to the election administrator, and contains
voter registration information subject to verification as provided by law.
(5) "Ballot" means a paper ballot counted manually or a paper ballot counted by a machine, such
as an optical scan system or other technology that automatically tabulates votes cast by processing the paper
ballots.
(6) (a) "Ballot issue" or "issue" means a proposal submitted to the people at an election for their
approval or rejection, including but not limited to an initiative, referendum, proposed constitutional amendment,
recall question, school levy question, bond issue question, or ballot question.
(b) For the purposes of chapters 35 and 37, an issue becomes a "ballot issue" upon certification by
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 395

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 395.1
the proper official that the legal procedure necessary for its qualification and placement on the ballot has been
completed, except that a statewide issue becomes a "ballot issue" upon preparation and transmission by the
secretary of state of the form of the petition or referral to the person who submitted the proposed issue.
(7) "Ballot issue committee" means a political committee specifically organized to support or
oppose a ballot issue.
(8) "Candidate" means:
(a) an individual who has filed a declaration or petition for nomination, acceptance of nomination,
or appointment as a candidate for public office as required by law;
(b) for the purposes of chapter 35, 36, or 37, an individual who has solicited or received and
retained contributions, made expenditures, or given consent to an individual, organization, political party, or
committee to solicit or receive and retain contributions or make expenditures on the individual's behalf to secure
nomination or election to any office at any time, whether or not the office for which the individual will seek
nomination or election is known when the:
(i) solicitation is made;
(ii) contribution is received and retained; or
(iii) expenditure is made; or
(c) an officeholder who is the subject of a recall election.
(9) (a) "Contribution" means:
(i) the receipt by a candidate or a political committee of an advance, gift, loan, conveyance,
deposit, payment, or distribution of money or anything of value to support or oppose a candidate or a ballot
issue;
(ii) an expenditure, including an in-kind expenditure, that is made in coordination with a candidate
or ballot issue committee and is reportable by the candidate or ballot issue committee as a contribution;
(iii) the receipt by a political committee of funds transferred from another political committee; or
(iv) the payment by a person other than a candidate or political committee of compensation for the
personal services of another person that are rendered to a candidate or political committee.
(b) The term does not mean:
(i) services provided without compensation by individuals volunteering a portion or all of their time
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 395

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 395.1
on behalf of a candidate or political committee;
(ii) meals and lodging provided by individuals in their private residences for a candidate or other
individual;
(iii) the use of a person's real property for a fundraising reception or other political event; or
(iv) the cost of a communication not for distribution to the general public by a religious organization
exempt from federal income tax when compliance with Title 13 would burden the organization's sincerely held
religious beliefs or practices.
(c) This definition does not apply to Title 13, chapter 37, part 6.
(10) "Coordinated", including any variations of the term, means made in cooperation with, in
consultation with, at the request of, or with the express prior consent of a candidate or political committee or an
agent of a candidate or political committee.
(11) "De minimis act" means an action, contribution, or expenditure that is so small that it does not
trigger registration, reporting, disclaimer, or disclosure obligations under Title 13, chapter 35 or 37, or warrant
enforcement as a campaign practices violation under Title 13, chapter 37.
(12) "Disability" means a temporary or permanent mental or physical impairment such as:
(a) impaired vision;
(b) impaired hearing;
(c) impaired mobility. Individuals having impaired mobility include those who require use of a
wheelchair and those who are ambulatory but are physically impaired because of age, disability, or disease.
(d) impaired mental or physical functioning that makes it difficult for the person to participate in the
process of voting.
(13) "Election" means a general, special, or primary election held pursuant to the requirements of
state law, regardless of the time or purpose.
(14) (a) "Election administrator" means, except as provided in subsection (14)(b), the county clerk
and recorder or the individual designated by a county governing body to be responsible for all election
administration duties, except that with regard to school elections not administered by the county, the term
means the school district clerk.
(b) As used in chapter 2 regarding voter registration, the term means the county clerk and recorder
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 395

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 395.1
or the individual designated by a county governing body to be responsible for all election administration duties
even if the school election is administered by the school district clerk.
(15) (a) "Election communication" means the following forms of communication to support or
oppose a candidate or ballot issue:
(i) a paid advertisement broadcast over radio, television, cable, or satellite;
(ii) paid placement of content on the internet or other electronic communication network;
(iii) a paid advertisement published in a newspaper or periodical or on a billboard;
(iv) a mailing; or
(v) printed materials.
(b) The term does not mean:
(i) an activity or communication for the purpose of encouraging individuals to register to vote or to
vote, if that activity or communication does not mention or depict a clearly identified candidate or ballot issue;
(ii) a communication that does not support or oppose a candidate or ballot issue;
(iii) a bona fide news story, commentary, blog, or editorial distributed through the facilities of any
broadcasting station, newspaper, magazine, internet website, or other periodical publication of general
circulation;
(iv) a communication by any membership organization or corporation to its members, stockholders,
or employees;
(v) a communication not for distribution to the general public by a religious organization exempt
from federal income tax when compliance with Title 13 would burden the organization's sincerely held religious
beliefs or practices; or
(vi) a communication that the commissioner determines by rule is not an election communication.
(16) "Election judge" means a person who is appointed pursuant to Title 13, chapter 4, part 1, to
perform duties as specified by law.
(17) "Election official" means an election administrator, election deputy, or election judge.
(18) "Election worker" means an individual designated by an election official to perform election
support duties.
(19) (a) "Electioneering communication" means a paid communication that is publicly distributed by
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 395

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 395.1
radio, television, cable, satellite, internet website, newspaper, periodical, billboard, mail, or any other
distribution of printed materials, that is made within 60 days of the initiation of voting in an election, that does
not support or oppose a candidate or ballot issue, that can be received by more than 100 recipients in the
district voting on the candidate or ballot issue, and that:
(i) refers to one or more clearly identified candidates in that election;
(ii) depicts the name, image, likeness, or voice of one or more clearly identified candidates in that
election; or
(iii) refers to a political party, ballot issue, or other question submitted to the voters in that election.
(b) The term does not mean:
(i) a bona fide news story, commentary, blog, or editorial distributed through the facilities of any
broadcasting station, newspaper, magazine, internet website, or other periodical publication of general
circulation unless the facilities are owned or controlled by a candidate or political committee;
(ii) a communication by any membership organization or corporation to its members, stockholders,
or employees;
(iii) a commercial communication that depicts a candidate's name, image, likeness, or voice only in
the candidate's capacity as owner, operator, or employee of a business that existed prior to the candidacy;
(iv) a communication that constitutes a candidate debate or forum or that solely promotes a
candidate debate or forum and is made by or on behalf of the person sponsoring the debate or forum;
(v) a communication not for distribution to the general public by a religious organization exempt
from federal income tax when compliance with Title 13 would burden the organization's sincerely held religious
beliefs or practices; or
(vi) a communication that the commissioner determines by rule is not an electioneering
communication.
(20) "Elector" means an individual qualified to vote under state law.
(21) (a) "Expenditure" means a purchase, payment, distribution, loan, advance, promise, pledge, or
gift of money or anything of value:
(i) made by a candidate or political committee to support or oppose a candidate or a ballot issue;
(ii) made by a candidate while the candidate is engaging in campaign activity to pay child-care
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 395

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 395.1
expenses as provided in 13-37-220; or
(iii) used or intended for use in making independent expenditures or in producing electioneering
communications.
(b) The term does not mean:
(i) services, food, or lodging provided in a manner that they are not contributions under subsection
(9);
(ii) except as provided in subsection (21)(a)(ii), payments by a candidate for personal travel
expenses, food, clothing, lodging, or personal necessities for the candidate and the candidate's family;
(iii) the cost of any bona fide news story, commentary, blog, or editorial distributed through the
facilities of any broadcasting station, newspaper, magazine, or other periodical publication of general
circulation;
(iv) the cost of any communication by any membership organization or corporation to its members
or stockholders or employees;
(v) the use of a person's real property for a fundraising reception or other political event; or
(vi) the cost of a communication not for distribution to the general public by a religious organization
exempt from federal income tax when compliance with Title 13 would burden the organization's sincerely held
religious beliefs or practices.
(c) This definition does not apply to Title 13, chapter 37, part 6.
(22) "Federal election" means an election in even-numbered years in which an elector may vote for
individuals for the office of president of the United States or for the United States congress.
(23) "General election" means an election that is held for offices that first appear on a primary
election ballot, unless the primary is canceled as authorized by law, and that is held on a date specified in 13-1-
104.
(24) "Inactive elector" means an individual who failed to respond to confirmation notices and whose
name was placed on the inactive list pursuant to 13-2-220 or 13-19-313.
(25) "Inactive list" means a list of inactive electors maintained pursuant to 13-2-220 or 13-19-313.
(26) (a) "Incidental committee" means a political committee that is not specifically organized or
operating for the primary purpose of supporting or opposing candidates or ballot issues but that may
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 395

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 395.1
incidentally become a political committee by receiving a contribution or making an expenditure.
(b) For the purpose of this subsection (26), the primary purpose is determined by the
commissioner by rule and includes criteria such as the allocation of budget, staff, or members' activity or the
statement of purpose or goal of the person or individuals that form the committee.
(27) "Independent committee" means a political committee organized for the primary purpose of
receiving contributions and making expenditures that is not controlled either directly or indirectly by a candidate
and that does not coordinate with a candidate in conjunction with the making of expenditures except pursuant
to the limits set forth in 13-37-216(1).
(28) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure for an election communication to support or
oppose a candidate or ballot issue made at any time that is not coordinated with a candidate or ballot issue
committee.
(29) "Individual" means a human being.
(30) "Legally registered elector" means an individual whose application for voter registration was
accepted, processed, and verified as provided by law.
(31) "Mail ballot election" means any election that is conducted under Title 13, chapter 19, by
mailing ballots to all active electors.
(32) "Penal institution" means any penal or correctional facility, including but not limited to a facility
for the mentally ill or mentally defective, in which inmates may lawfully be confined as a consequence of a
felony conviction.
(32)(33)"Person" means an individual, corporation, association, firm, partnership, cooperative,
committee, including a political committee, club, union, or other organization or group of individuals or a
candidate as defined in subsection (8).
(33)(34)"Place of deposit" means a location designated by the election administrator pursuant to 13-19-
307 for a mail ballot election conducted under Title 13, chapter 19.
(34)(35)(a) "Political committee" means a combination of two or more individuals or a person other than
an individual who receives a contribution or makes an expenditure:
(i) to support or oppose a candidate or a committee organized to support or oppose a candidate
or a petition for nomination;
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – HB 395

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 395.1
(ii) to support or oppose a ballot issue or a committee organized to support or oppose a ballot
issue; or
(iii) to prepare or disseminate an election communication, an electioneering communication, or an
independent expenditure.
(b) Political committees include ballot issue committees, incidental committees, independent
committees, and political party committees.
(c) A candidate and the candidate's treasurer do not constitute a political committee.
(d) A political committee is not formed when a combination of two or more individuals or a person
other than an individual makes an election communication, an electioneering communication, or an
independent expenditure of $250 or less.
(e) A joint fundraising committee is not a political committee.
(35)(36)"Political party committee" means a political committee formed by a political party organization
and includes all county and city central committees.
(36)(37)"Political party organization" means a political organization that:
(a) was represented on the official ballot in either of the two most recent statewide general
elections; or
(b) has met the petition requirements provided in Title 13, chapter 10, part 5.
(37)(38)"Political subdivision" means a county, consolidated municipal-county government,
municipality, special purpose district, or any other unit of government, except school districts, having authority
to hold an election.
(38)(39)"Polling place election" means an election primarily conducted at polling places rather than by
mail under the provisions of Title 13, chapter 19.
(39)(40)"Primary" or "primary election" means an election held on a date specified in 13-1-107 to
nominate candidates for offices filled at a general election.
(40)(41)"Provisional ballot" means a ballot cast by an elector whose identity or eligibility to vote has not
been verified as provided by law.
(41)(42)"Provisionally registered elector" means an individual whose application for voter registration
was accepted but whose identity or eligibility has not yet been verified as provided by law.
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – HB 395

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 395.1
(42)(43)"Public office" means a state, county, municipal, school, or other district office that is filled by
the people at an election.
(43)(44)"Random-sample audit" means an audit involving a manual count of ballots from designated
races and ballot issues in precincts selected through a random process as provided in 13-17-503 and 13-17-
510.
(44)(45)"Registrar" means the county election administrator and any regularly appointed deputy or
assistant election administrator.
(45)(46)"Regular school election" means the school trustee election provided for in 20-20-105(1).
(46)(47)"Religious organization" means a house of worship with the major purpose of supporting
religious activities, including but not limited to a church, mosque, shrine, synagogue, or temple. The organic
documents of the organization must list a formal code of doctrine and discipline, and the organization must
spend the majority of its money on religious activities such as regular religious services, educational
preparation for its ministers, development and support of its ministers, membership development, outreach and
support, and the production and distribution of religious literature developed by the organization.
(47)(48)"School election" has the meaning provided in 20-1-101.
(48)(49)"School election filing officer" means the filing officer with whom the declarations for nomination
for school district office were filed or with whom the school ballot issue was filed.
(49)(50)"School recount board" means the board authorized pursuant to 20-20-420 to perform recount
duties in school elections.
(50)(51)"Signature envelope" means an envelope that contains a secrecy envelope and ballot and that
is designed to:
(a) allow election officials, upon examination of the outside of the envelope, to determine that the
ballot is being submitted by someone who is in fact a qualified elector and who has not already voted; and
(b) allow it to be used in the United States mail.
(51)(52)"Special election" means an election held on a day other than the day specified for a primary
election, general election, or regular school election.
(52)(53)"Special purpose district" means an area with special boundaries created as authorized by law
for a specialized and limited purpose.
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – HB 395

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 395.1
(53)(54)"Statewide voter registration list" means the voter registration list established and maintained
pursuant to 13-2-107 and 13-2-108.
(54)(55)"Support or oppose", including any variations of the term, means:
(a) using express words, including but not limited to "vote", "oppose", "support", "elect", "defeat", or
"reject", that call for the nomination, election, or defeat of one or more clearly identified candidates, the election
or defeat of one or more political parties, or the passage or defeat of one or more ballot issues submitted to
voters in an election; or
(b) otherwise referring to or depicting one or more clearly identified candidates, political parties, or
ballot issues in a manner that is susceptible of no reasonable interpretation other than as a call for the
nomination, election, or defeat of the candidate in an election, the election or defeat of the political party, or the
passage or defeat of the ballot issue or other question submitted to the voters in an election.
(56) "Unsound mind" has the same meaning as provided in 53-21-102.
(55)(57)"Valid vote" means a vote that has been counted as valid or determined to be valid as provided
in 13-15-206.
(56)(58)"Voted ballot" means a ballot that is:
(a) deposited in the ballot box at a polling place;
(b) received at the election administrator's office; or
(c) returned to a place of deposit.
(57)(59)"Voter interface device" means a voting system that:
(a) is accessible to electors with disabilities;
(b) communicates voting instructions and ballot information to a voter;
(c) allows the voter to select and vote for candidates and issues and to verify and change
selections; and
(d) produces a paper ballot that displays electors' choices so the elector can confirm the ballot's
accuracy and that may be manually counted.
(58)(60)"Voting system" or "system" means any machine, device, technology, or equipment used to
automatically record, tabulate, or process the vote of an elector cast on a paper ballot."

- 10 - Authorized Print Version – HB 395

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 395.1
Section 2. Section 46-14-312, MCA, is amended to read:
"46-14-312. Sentence to be imposed. (1) If the court finds that the defendant at the time of the
commission of the offense of which the defendant was convicted did not suffer from a mental disease or
disorder as described in 46-14-311, the court shall sentence the defendant as provided in Title 46, chapter 18.
(2) If the court finds that the defendant at the time of the commission of the offense suffered from a
mental disease or disorder or developmental disability as described in 46-14-311, any mandatory minimum
sentence prescribed by law for the offense need not apply. The court shall sentence the defendant to be
committed to the custody of the director of the department of public health and human services to be placed,
after consideration of the recommendations of the professionals providing treatment to the defendant and
recommendations of the professionals who have evaluated the defendant, in an appropriate correctional facility,
mental health facility, as defined in 53-21-102, residential facility, as defined in 53-20-102, or developmental
disabilities facility, as defined in 53-20-202, for custody, care, and treatment for a definite period of time not to
exceed the maximum term of imprisonment that could be imposed under subsection (1). The director may, after
considering the recommendations of the professionals providing treatment to the defendant and
recommendations of the professionals who have evaluated the defendant, subsequently transfer the defendant
to another correctional, mental health, residential, or developmental disabilities facility that will better serve the
defendant's custody, care, and treatment needs. The authority of the court with regard to sentencing is the
same as authorized in Title 46, chapter 18, if the treatment of the individual and the protection of the public are
provided for.
(3) The court shall make a finding as to whether the defendant is of unsound mind as defined in
53-21-102.
(3)(4) Either the director or a defendant whose sentence has been imposed under subsection (2) may
petition the sentencing court for review of the sentence if the professional person certifies that:
(a) the defendant no longer suffers from a mental disease or disorder;
(b) the defendant's mental disease or disorder no longer renders the defendant unable to
appreciate the criminality of the defendant's conduct or to conform the defendant's conduct to the requirements
of law;
(c) the defendant suffers from a mental disease or disorder or developmental disability but is not a
- 11 - Authorized Print Version – HB 395

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 395.1
danger to the defendant or others; or
(d) the defendant suffers from a mental disease or disorder that makes the defendant a danger to
the defendant or others, but:
(i) there is no treatment available for the mental disease or disorder;
(ii) the defendant refuses to cooperate with treatment; or
(iii) the defendant will no longer benefit from active inpatient treatment for the mental disease or
disorder.
(4)(5) The sentencing court may make any order not inconsistent with its original sentencing
authority, except that the length of confinement or supervision must be equal to that of the original sentence.
The professional person shall review the defendant's status each year.
(6) On release from the custody of the director of the department of public health and human
services, the defendant may no longer be considered to be of unsound mind."

Section 3. Section 53-21-102, MCA, is amended to read:
"53-21-102. Definitions. As used in this chapter, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Abuse" means any willful, negligent, or reckless mental, physical, sexual, or verbal
mistreatment or maltreatment or misappropriation of personal property of any person receiving treatment in a
mental health facility that insults the psychosocial, physical, or sexual integrity of any person receiving
treatment in a mental health facility.
(2) "Behavioral health inpatient facility" means a facility or a distinct part of a facility of 16 beds or
less licensed by the department that is capable of providing secure, inpatient psychiatric services, including
services to persons with mental illness and co-occurring chemical dependency.
(3) "Board" or "mental disabilities board of visitors" means the mental disabilities board of visitors
created by 2-15-211.
(4) "Commitment" means an order by a court requiring an individual to receive treatment for a
mental disorder.
(5) "Court" means any district court of the state of Montana.
(6) "Department" means the department of public health and human services provided for in 2-15-
- 12 - Authorized Print Version – HB 395

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 395.1
2201.
(7) "Emergency situation" means:
(a) a situation in which any person is in imminent danger of death or bodily harm from the activity
of a person who appears to be suffering from a mental disorder and appears to require commitment; or
(b) a situation in which any person who appears to be suffering from a mental disorder and
appears to require commitment is substantially unable to provide for the person's own basic needs of food,
clothing, shelter, health, or safety.
(8) "Friend of respondent" means any person willing and able to assist a person suffering from a
mental disorder and requiring commitment or a person alleged to be suffering from a mental disorder and
requiring commitment in dealing with legal proceedings, including consultation with legal counsel and others.
(9) (a) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment that has substantial
adverse effects on an individual's cognitive or volitional functions.
(b) The term does not include:
(i) addiction to drugs or alcohol;
(ii) drug or alcohol intoxication;
(iii) intellectual disability; or
(iv) epilepsy.
(c) A mental disorder may co-occur with addiction or chemical dependency.
(10) "Mental health facility" or "facility" means the state hospital, the Montana mental health nursing
care center, or a hospital, a behavioral health inpatient facility, a mental health center, a residential treatment
facility, or a residential treatment center licensed or certified by the department that provides treatment to
children or adults with a mental disorder. A correctional institution or facility or jail is not a mental health facility
within the meaning of this part.
(11) "Mental health professional" means:
(a) a certified professional person;
(b) a physician licensed under Title 37, chapter 3;
(c) a clinical professional counselor licensed under Title 37, chapter 39;
(d) a psychologist licensed under Title 37, chapter 17;
- 13 - Authorized Print Version – HB 395

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 395.1
(e) a clinical social worker licensed under Title 37, chapter 39;
(f) an advanced practice registered nurse, as provided for in 37-8-202, with a clinical specialty in
psychiatric mental health nursing;
(g) a physician assistant licensed under Title 37, chapter 20, with a clinical specialty in psychiatric
mental health; or
(h) a marriage and family therapist licensed under Title 37, chapter 39.
(12) (a) "Neglect" means failure to provide for the biological and psychosocial needs of any person
receiving treatment in a mental health facility, failure to report abuse, or failure to exercise supervisory
responsibilities to protect patients from abuse and neglect.
(b) The term includes but is not limited to:
(i) deprivation of food, shelter, appropriate clothing, nursing care, or other services;
(ii) failure to follow a prescribed plan of care and treatment; or
(iii) failure to respond to a person in an emergency situation by indifference, carelessness, or
intention.
(13) "Next of kin" includes but is not limited to the spouse, parents, adult children, and adult brothers
and sisters of a person.
(14) "Patient" means a person committed by the court for treatment for any period of time or who is
voluntarily admitted for treatment for any period of time.
(15) "Peace officer" means any sheriff, deputy sheriff, marshal, police officer, or other peace officer.
(16) "Professional person" means:
(a) a medical doctor;
(b) an advanced practice registered nurse, as provided for in 37-8-202, with a clinical specialty in
psychiatric mental health nursing;
(c) a licensed psychologist;
(d) a physician assistant licensed under Title 37, chapter 20, with a clinical specialty in psychiatric
mental health; or
(e) a person who has been certified, as provided for in 53-21-106, by the department.
(17) "Reasonable medical certainty" means reasonable certainty as judged by the standards of a
- 14 - Authorized Print Version – HB 395

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 395.1
professional person.
(18) "Respondent" means a person alleged in a petition filed pursuant to this part to be suffering
from a mental disorder and requiring commitment.
(19) "State hospital" means the Montana state hospital.
(20) "Unsound mind" means a person is incapable of normally managing affairs in a reasonable
manner. The condition exists when the intellectual powers of a person are fundamentally lacking or when a
person is incapable of understanding and acting with discretion in the ordinary affairs of life. The term includes
a range of mental disorders as defined in this section."

Section 4. Section 53-21-127, MCA, is amended to read:
"53-21-127. (Temporary) Posttrial disposition. (1) If, upon trial, it is determined that the respondent
is not suffering from a mental disorder or does not require commitment within the meaning of this part, the
respondent must be discharged and the petition dismissed.
(2) If it is determined that the respondent is suffering from a mental disorder and requires
commitment within the meaning of this part, the court shall hold a posttrial disposition hearing. The disposition
hearing must be held within 5 days (including Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays unless the fifth day falls on a
Saturday, Sunday, or holiday), during which time the court may order further evaluation and treatment of the
respondent.
(3) At the conclusion of the disposition hearing and pursuant to the provisions in subsection (7),
the court shall:
(a) subject to the provisions of 53-21-193, commit the respondent to the state hospital or to a
behavioral health inpatient facility for a period of not more than 3 months;
(b) commit the respondent to a community facility, which may include a category D assisted living
facility, or a community program or to any appropriate course of treatment, which may include housing or
residential requirements or conditions as provided in 53-21-149, for a period of:
(i) not more than 3 months; or
(ii) not more than 6 months in order to provide the respondent with a less restrictive commitment in
the community rather than a more restrictive placement in the state hospital if a respondent has been
- 15 - Authorized Print Version – HB 395

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 395.1
previously involuntarily committed for inpatient treatment in a mental health facility and the court determines
that the admission of evidence of the previous involuntary commitment is relevant to the criterion of
predictability, as provided in 53-21-126(1)(d), and outweighs the prejudicial effect of its admission, as provided
in 53-21-190; or
(c) commit the respondent to the Montana mental health nursing care center for a period of not
more than 3 months if the following conditions are met:
(i) the respondent meets the admission criteria of the center as described in 53-21-411 and
established in administrative rules of the department; and
(ii) the superintendent of the center has issued a written authorization specifying a date and time
for admission.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (3)(b)(ii), a treatment ordered pursuant to this section may not
affect the respondent's custody or course of treatment for a period of more than 3 months.
(5) In determining which of the alternatives in subsection (3) to order, the court shall choose the
least restrictive alternatives necessary to protect the respondent and the public and to permit effective
treatment.
(6) The court may authorize the chief medical officer of a facility or a physician designated by the
court to administer appropriate medication involuntarily if the court finds that involuntary medication is
necessary to protect the respondent or the public or to facilitate effective treatment. Medication may not be
involuntarily administered to a patient unless the chief medical officer of the facility or a physician designated by
the court approves it prior to the beginning of the involuntary administration and unless, if possible, a
medication review committee reviews it prior to the beginning of the involuntary administration or, if prior review
is not possible, within 5 working days after the beginning of the involuntary administration. The medication
review committee must include at least one person who is not an employee of the facility or program. The
patient and the patient's attorney or advocate, if the patient has one, must receive adequate written notice of
the date, time, and place of the review and must be allowed to appear and give testimony and evidence. The
involuntary administration of medication must be again reviewed by the committee 14 days and 90 days after
the beginning of the involuntary administration if medication is still being involuntarily administered. The mental
disabilities board of visitors and the director of the department of public health and human services must be
- 16 - Authorized Print Version – HB 395

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 395.1
fully informed of the matter within 5 working days after the beginning of the involuntary administration. The
director shall report to the governor on an annual basis.
(7) Satisfaction of any one of the criteria listed in 53-21-126(1) justifies commitment pursuant to
this chapter. However, if the court relies solely upon the criterion provided in 53-21-126(1)(d), the court may
require commitment only to a community facility, which may include a category D assisted living facility, or a
program or an appropriate course of treatment, as provided in subsection (3)(b), and may not require
commitment at the state hospital, a behavioral health inpatient facility, or the Montana mental health nursing
care center.
(8) In ordering commitment pursuant to this section, the court shall make the following findings of
fact:
(a) a detailed statement of the facts upon which the court found the respondent to be suffering
from a mental disorder and requiring commitment;
(b) the alternatives for treatment that were considered;
(c) the alternatives available for treatment of the respondent;
(d) the reason that any treatment alternatives were determined to be unsuitable for the
respondent;
(e) the name of the facility, program, or individual to be responsible for the management and
supervision of the respondent's treatment;
(f) if the order includes a requirement for inpatient treatment, the reason inpatient treatment was
chosen from among other alternatives;
(g) if the order commits the respondent to the Montana mental health nursing care center, a finding
that the respondent meets the admission criteria of the center and that the superintendent of the center has
issued a written authorization specifying a date and time for admission;
(h) if the order provides for an evaluation to determine eligibility for entering a category D assisted
living facility, a finding that indicates whether:
(i) the respondent meets the admission criteria;
(ii) there is availability in a category D assisted living facility; and
(iii) a category D assisted living facility is the least restrictive environment because the respondent
- 17 - Authorized Print Version – HB 395

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 395.1
is unlikely to benefit from involuntary commitment to facilities with more intensive treatment; and
(i) if the order includes involuntary medication, the reason involuntary medication was chosen
from among other alternatives.
53-21-127. (Effective July 1, 2025) Posttrial disposition. (1) A respondent must be discharged and
the petition dismissed if, upon trial, it is determined that the respondent:
(a) is not suffering from a mental disorder;
(b) does not require commitment within the meaning of this part; or
(c) is suffering from a mental disorder but the respondent's primary diagnosis is Alzheimer's
disease, other forms of dementia, or traumatic brain injury and the respondent meets only the commitment
criteria outlined in 53-21-126(1)(a) or (1)(d)(i)(B).
(2) If it is determined that the respondent is suffering from a mental disorder and requires
commitment within the meaning of this part, the court shall hold a posttrial disposition hearing. The disposition
hearing must be held within 5 days (including Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays unless the fifth day falls on a
Saturday, Sunday, or holiday), during which time the court may order further evaluation and treatment of the
respondent.
(3) At the conclusion of the disposition hearing and pursuant to the provisions in subsection (7),
the court shall:
(a) subject to the provisions of 53-21-193, commit the respondent to the state hospital or to a
behavioral health inpatient facility for a period of not more than 3 months;
(b) commit the respondent to a community facility, which may include a category D assisted living
facility, or a community program or to any appropriate course of treatment, which may include housing or
residential requirements or conditions as provided in 53-21-149, for a period of:
(i) not more than 3 months; or
(ii) not more than 6 months in order to provide the respondent with a less restrictive commitment in
the community rather than a more restrictive placement in the state hospital if a respondent has been
previously involuntarily committed for inpatient treatment in a mental health facility and the court determines
that the admission of evidence of the previous involuntary commitment is relevant to the criterion of
predictability, as provided in 53-21-126(1)(d), and outweighs the prejudicial effect of its admission, as provided
- 18 - Authorized Print Version – HB 395

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 395.1
in 53-21-190; or
(c) commit the respondent to the Montana mental health nursing care center for a period of not
more than 3 months if the following conditions are met:
(i) the respondent meets the admission criteria of the center as described in 53-21-411 and
established in administrative rules of the department; and
(ii) the superintendent of the center has issued a written authorization specifying a date and time
for admission.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (3)(b)(ii), a treatment ordered pursuant to this section may not
affect the respondent's custody or course of treatment for a period of more than 3 months.
(5) In determining which of the alternatives in subsection (3) to order, the court shall choose the
least restrictive alternatives necessary to protect the respondent and the public and to permit effective
treatment.
(6) The court may authorize the chief medical officer of a facility or a physician designated by the
court to administer appropriate medication involuntarily if the court finds that involuntary medication is
necessary to protect the respondent or the public or to facilitate effective treatment. Medication may not be
involuntarily administered to a patient unless the chief medical officer of the facility or a physician designated by
the court approves it prior to the beginning of the involuntary administration and unless, if possible, a
medication review committee reviews it prior to the beginning of the involuntary administration or, if prior review
is not possible, within 5 working days after the beginning of the involuntary administration. The medication
review committee must include at least one person who is not an employee of the facility or program. The
patient and the patient's attorney or advocate, if the patient has one, must receive adequate written notice of
the date, time, and place of the review and must be allowed to appear and give testimony and evidence. The
involuntary administration of medication must be again reviewed by the committee 14 days and 90 days after
the beginning of the involuntary administration if medication is still being involuntarily administered. The mental
disabilities board of visitors and the director of the department of public health and human services must be
fully informed of the matter within 5 working days after the beginning of the involuntary administration. The
director shall report to the governor on an annual basis.
(7) Except as provided in 53-21-126(7), satisfaction of any one of the criteria listed in 53-21-126(1)
- 19 - Authorized Print Version – HB 395

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 395.1
justifies commitment pursuant to this chapter. However, if the court relies solely on the criterion provided in 53-
21-126(1)(d), the court may require commitment only to a community facility, which may include a category D
assisted living facility, or a program or an appropriate course of treatment, as provided in subsection (3)(b), and
may not require commitment at the state hospital, a behavioral health inpatient facility, or the Montana mental
health nursing care center.
(8) In ordering commitment pursuant to this section, the court shall make the following findings of
fact:
(a) a detailed statement of the facts upon which the court found the respondent to be suffering
from a mental disorder and requiring commitment;
(b) the alternatives for treatment that were considered;
(c) the alternatives available for treatment of the respondent;
(d) the reason that any treatment alternatives were determined to be unsuitable for the
respondent;
(e) the name of the facility, program, or individual to be responsible for the management and
supervision of the respondent's treatment;
(f) whether the respondent is of unsound mind as defined in 53-21-102;
(f)(g) if the order includes a requirement for inpatient treatment, the reason inpatient treatment was
chosen from among other alternatives;
(g)(h) if the order commits the respondent to the Montana mental health nursing care center, a finding
that the respondent meets the admission criteria of the center and that the superintendent of the center has
issued a written authorization specifying a date and time for admission;
(h)(i) if the order provides for an evaluation to determine eligibility for entering a category D assisted
living facility, a finding that indicates whether:
(i) the respondent meets the admission criteria;
(ii) there is availability in a category D assisted living facility; and
(iii) a category D assisted living facility is the least restrictive environment because the respondent
is unlikely to benefit from involuntary commitment to facilities with more intensive treatment; and
(i)(j) if the order includes involuntary medication, the reason involuntary medication was chosen
- 20 - Authorized Print Version – HB 395

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 395.1
from among other alternatives."

Section 5. Section 53-21-181, MCA, is amended to read:
"53-21-181. Discharge during or at end of initial commitment period -- patient's right to referral.
(1) (a) At any time within the period of commitment provided for in 53-21-127, the patient may be discharged on
the written order of the professional person in charge of the patient without further order of the court.
(b) If the patient is not discharged within the period of commitment and if the term is not extended
as provided for in 53-21-128, a patient whose commitment was to a facility other than a category D assisted
living facility must be discharged by the facility at the end of the period of commitment without further order of
the court.
(c) A patient who was committed to a category D assisted living facility may be discharged from
supervision by the court but may remain as a resident if the category D assisted living facility and the patient
agree.
(2) Notice of the discharge must be filed with the court and the county attorney at least 5 days prior
to the discharge. Failure to comply with the notice requirement may not delay the discharge of the patient.
(3) Upon being discharged, each patient has a right to be referred, as appropriate, to other
providers of mental health services.
(4) Upon being discharged, a patient may no longer be considered to be of unsound mind as
defined in 53-21-102."

Section 6. Section 53-21-197, MCA, is amended to read:
"53-21-197. Hearing on rehospitalization petition -- revocation of conditional release. (1) The
court may order that the patient's conditional release status be revoked and that the patient be returned to the
mental health facility from which the patient was conditionally released or be sent to another appropriate
inpatient mental health facility if, after a hearing, the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that:
(a) the conditionally released patient has been determined by the district court to be suffering from
a mental disorder and requiring commitment and is presently under a valid order of commitment pursuant to 53-
21-127 or 53-21-128; and
- 21 - Authorized Print Version – HB 395

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 395.1
(b) the conditionally released patient has violated a condition of the release, that the violation has
caused a deterioration of the patient's mental condition, and that as a result of this deterioration, the patient can
no longer be appropriately served by outpatient care.
(2) A revocation of the patient's conditional release status under subsection (1) must be based on
the testimony of the professional person responsible for the patient's case.
(3) If the court revokes the patient's conditional release status pursuant to subsection (1), a
treatment plan must be updated or a new plan prepared for the patient as required by and within the time set
forth in 53-21-162. The court shall also make a finding of whether the patient is of unsound mind as defined in
53-21-102.
(4) Except as provided in 53-21-198, an order revoking the patient's conditional release status may
not order hospitalization or impose other conditions of release that extend beyond the expiration date of the
order committing the patient under 53-21-127 or 53-21-128."
- END -
- 22 - Authorized Print Version – HB 395